Louisiana, session 2026, SB112.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Subpart E of Part III of Chapter 1 of Title 17 of the Louisiana Revised
Statutes of 1950, comprised of R.S. 17:288.1 through 288.5, and R.S. 17:3996(B)(92) are
hereby enacted to read as follows:
SUBPART E. SCHOOL RELEASED TIME EDUCATION ACT
§288.1. Short title; legislative intent
A. This Subpart shall be known as and may be cited as the "School
Released Time Education Act".
B. The legislature finds all of the following:
(1) In 1952, the Supreme Court of the United States ruled that public
schools may release students during school hours for off-campus religious
instruction, provided that there is parental consent and that the program is not
publicly funded. The ruling established that public schools allowing released
Page 1 of 7
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 112 ENROLLED
time for religious instruction is permissible under the Constitution of the United
States of America. (Zorach v. Clauson, 343 U.S. 306).
(2) Article 101 of the Louisiana Children's Code declares that "(t)he
people of Louisiana recognize the family as the most fundamental unit of human
society; that preserving families is essential to a free society; that the
relationship between parent and child is preeminent in establishing and
maintaining the well-being of the child; that parents have the responsibility for
providing the basic necessities of life as well as love and affection to their
children; that parents have the paramount right to raise their children in
accordance with their own values and traditions; that parents should make the
decisions regarding where and with whom the child shall reside, the
educational, moral, ethical, and religious training of the child…"
(3) As interest grows across Louisiana, legislation is needed to show
support for parents' rights to request released time courses of education for
their children.
§288.2. Definitions
Unless otherwise indicated, the following definitions shall apply to this
Subpart:
(1) "Department" means the state Department of Education.
(2) "Parent" means a biological birth parent, an adoptive parent, or the
legal guardian who is authorized by law to make decisions regarding the
education of his minor child.
(3) "Released time course" means a course in religious instruction taught
by a sponsoring entity in which a student is allowed to attend, subject to prior
approval by the minor student's parent, at an off-campus location, unless the
equal access provisions in R.S. 17:288.3 allow for the course to be taught on
campus.
(4) "School" means a public school, as defined in R.S. 17:236, that is
under the jurisdiction of the school board.
(5) "School board" means a city, parish, or other local public school
Page 2 of 7
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 112 ENROLLED
board that operates a public school, subject to the provisions of this Title.
(6) "Sponsoring entity" means a church or other religious organization
that is qualified as a tax-exempt organization under Section 501(c) of the United
States Internal Revenue Code, and receives written parental permission from
parents and authorization from the school board, to operate a released time
course program.
(7) "Student adult" means a person who is eighteen years of age or older
or is an emancipated minor who is authorized by law to make his own decisions
regarding his education.
§288.3. Released time courses; authorization; parental approval; requirements;
limitation on liability
A. Each school board may adopt a policy that allows students, subject to
parental approval, to participate in a released time course.
B. The policy adopted by the school board shall require all of the
following:
(1) That the minor student's parent gives written consent for the minor
student to attend a released time course.
(2) That the student adult indicates, in writing, his consent to attend the
released time course.
(3) That any sponsoring entity of a released time course that provides
transportation of students to or from a released time course maintain
automobile liability insurance with coverage limits in an amount not less than
the minimum coverage required by the school board for school buses operated
by or on behalf of the school system. Proof of such insurance shall be furnished
to the school board as a condition of providing such transportation.
C. The written consent, required in this Section, shall be on a form
created by the school board and shall include a notice that contains the
following:
(1) That the school and school board are free from liability for any injury
that occurs while the student is off campus at a released time course.
Page 3 of 7
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 112 ENROLLED
(2) That the school and school board are free from liability while the
student is being transported to or from the released time course.
(3) That any liability for injury that occurs at the released time course
is solely the responsibility of the entity sponsoring the released time course.
(4) That any liability for injuries that occur during the transportation to
or from the released time course shall be solely the responsibility of the
sponsoring entity or the person authorized, pursuant to this Subpart, to
transport the student.
D.(1) The sponsoring entity of the released time course shall maintain
attendance records and make them available to the school that the student
attends or to the school board.
(2) The released time course shall be no less than one hour and no more
than five hours per school week.
(3) When notification is given to a school, by a parent or student adult,
that the student is attending the released time course and subsequently does not
attend the course and is not otherwise present at the school, then the student
shall be recorded as having an unexcused absence by the school for that time
and shall be subject to the provisions of R.S. 17:233.
E. Criminal background checks shall be conducted, as provided in R.S.
15:587.1 and 587.7, on each instructor and any other person who may have
direct contact with or supervisory responsibility over a student participating in
a released time course. This requirement shall not apply to other students
participating in the course.
F.(1) The sponsoring entity assumes liability for the student while under
the control of the sponsoring entity.
(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, an
authorizing school board, school, or any officer or employee thereof shall be
immune from liability from any action or suit for any injury that takes place at
a released timed course held off campus or that takes place while the student is
being transported to or from the released timed course.
Page 4 of 7
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 112 ENROLLED
(3) Liability associated with any transportation of students to and from
a released time course that is at a location other than the school shall be the
responsibility of whichever of the following that applies:
(a) The parent who transports the parent's own child.
(b) Another person designated by the parent to transport the minor
student.
(c) The sponsoring entity who is authorized by the parent to transport
the student.
(d) The student adult who transports himself.
G. Any transportation to and from a released time course shall be
subject to specific prior written authorization by the parent unless the parent
is transporting the parent's own child.
H.(1) Released time courses shall not be held on school property unless
permitted under a neutral policy of equal access that opens school property for
use by community groups. To the extent that the other community groups are
allowed to use school property, then the school shall not discriminate against the
sponsoring entity, the student, or the parent who desires to have the minor
student attend the released time course.
(2) Nothing in this Subpart shall be interpreted to deny a released time
course or the sponsoring entity equal access to funds, benefits, or services that
the local school system may provide or make available to community groups or
independent secular entities.
I. Any school board that awards academic credit for a released time
course shall do both of the following:
(1) Require that each instructor for such course satisfy qualification
standards that are the same as the qualifications established by the school board
for substitute teachers employed within that school system.
(2) Require that the instructor or sponsoring entity providing the
released time course agree to report student grades, attendance, and any other
information required by the school board to the school in the manner and
Page 5 of 7
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 112 ENROLLED
format prescribed by the school board.
J. Nothing in this Section shall prohibit a school board from offering or
recognizing a virtual released time course provided through the internet or
other electronic medium in a manner consistent with R.S. 17:236.3.
§288.4. Credit for released time courses
A. The department shall provide a course credit code that participating
schools may use to award academic credit for the completion of a released time
course.
B. Nothing in this Subpart shall prohibit a participating school from
using the course credit code for high school students associated with the
academic course taught on the history and literature of the Bible, pursuant to
R.S. 17:282.
§288.5. Rules of construction; constitutional protections preserved
Nothing in this Subpart shall be construed to supersede, limit, or
diminish the rights guaranteed under the First Amendment to the Constitution
of the United States, Article I, Section 8 of the Constitution of Louisiana, or the
Preservation of Religious Freedom Act, R.S. 13:5231 et seq., all of which shall
prevail in the event of any conflict with any provision of this Subpart.
* * *
§3996. Charter schools; exemptions; requirements
* * *
B. Notwithstanding any state law, rule, or regulation to the contrary and
except as may be otherwise specifically provided for in an approved charter, a
charter school established and operated in accordance with the provisions of this
Chapter and its approved charter and the school's officers and employees shall be
exempt from all statutory mandates or other statutory requirements that are
applicable to public schools and to public school officers and employees except for
the following laws otherwise applicable to public schools with the same grades:
* * *
(92) Released time, R.S. 17:288.1 et seq.
Page 6 of 7
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 112 ENROLLED
Section 2. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 7 of 7
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.